Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3742
Grower, defined.

Grower shall mean any landowner personally engaged in growing dry beans, a tenant of a landowner personally engaged in growing dry beans, or both the owner and tenant jointly and shall include, but not be limited to, any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, corporation, cooperative, trust, or sharecropper or any other business unit, device, or arrangement.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 75.